Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 16.57.460 and 2023 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall submit a livestock inspection program report pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, to the appropriate committees of the legislature having oversight over agriculture and fiscal matters. The report must also be submitted to the livestock identification advisory committee created in RCW 16.57.015. The report must include amounts collected, a report on program expenditures, and any recommendations for making the program more efficient, improving the program, or modifying livestock inspection fees to cover the costs of the program. The report must also address the financial status of the program, including whether there is a need to review fees so that the program continues to be supported by fees.(2) This section expires July 1, ((2026))2030.Sec. 2. 2023 c 46 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Sections 1, 5, 8, and 11 of this act expire July 1, ((2026))2030.Sec. 3. 2023 c 46 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Sections 1, 3, 5, and 6 of this act expire July 1, ((2026))2030.Sec. 4. 2023 c 46 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, ((2026))2030.--- END ---